Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202613-2901
Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act, how cited.

Sections 13-2901 to 13-2914 shall be known and may be cited as the Political Subdivisions Construction Alternatives Act.

Laws 2002, LB 391, § 1; R.S.1943, (2003), § 79-2001;

Laws 2008, LB889, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 40.
July 18, 2026